District of Columbia statutes.
7-705.01

Injunctive relief.

A resident, a representative of a resident, the ombudsman, or the Attorney General may bring an action in court for a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction to enjoin a long-term care facility from violating a provision of subchapter II or III of this chapter or any rule issued by the Mayor pursuant to this chapter.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 501, 36 DCR 534
Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-321, § 2(i), 57 DCR 12438

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-705.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3541.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-321 substituted “Attorney General” for “Corporation Counsel”.